dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/fochsen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>fochsen</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefochst</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fochsen</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochs</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochst</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochsen</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochst</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochsen</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fochs</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fochst</l><r>fochsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/focken__vblex">
  <e><p><l>focken</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefockt</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>focken</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>focks</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fockt</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>focken</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fockt</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>focken</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fock</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fockt</l><r>focken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/follegen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>follegen</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefollegt</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>follegen</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegs</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegt</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegen</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegt</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegen</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>folleg</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>follegt</l><r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/folteren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>folteren</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefoltert</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>folteren</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>folters</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>foltert</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>folteren</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>foltert</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>folteren</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>folter</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>foltert</l><r>folteren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/fonkelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>fonkelen</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefonkelt</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fonkelen</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkels</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkelt</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkelen</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkelt</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkelen</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fonkel</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fonkelt</l><r>fonkelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/fooschen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>fooschen</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gefooscht</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fooschen</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooschs</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooscht</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooschen</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooscht</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooschen</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>foosch</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fooscht</l><r>fooschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/forcéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>forcéieren</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéiert</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>forcéieren</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéiers</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéiert</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéieren</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéiert</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéieren</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>forcéier</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forcéiert</l><r>forcéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/formatéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>formatéieren</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéiert</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>formatéieren</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéiers</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéiert</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéieren</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéiert</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéieren</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>formatéier</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formatéiert</l><r>formatéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/formen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>formen</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>geformt</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>formen</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forms</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formt</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formen</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formt</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formen</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>form</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formt</l><r>formen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/formuléieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>formuléieren</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléiert</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>formuléieren</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléiers</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléiert</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléieren</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléiert</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléieren</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>formuléier</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>formuléiert</l><r>formuléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/forméieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>forméieren</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméiert</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>forméieren</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméiers</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméiert</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméieren</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméiert</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméieren</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>forméier</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>forméiert</l><r>forméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/fotograféieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>fotograféieren</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféiert</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fotograféieren</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféiers</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféiert</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféieren</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféiert</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféieren</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>fotograféier</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>fotograféiert</l><r>fotograféieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
